Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 1

Parties to Actions

20-1-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-1-101 (Code 1858, § 2795 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 29, § 1); Shan., § 4492; Code 1932, § 8619; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-101), concerning real plaintiffs, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 273, § 2.

20-1-102. Indemnification of nominal plaintiff.

The person whose name is used in the prosecution of a suit may, at any time during the progress of the cause, require the party for whose benefit the action is brought to give bond, with good security, to indemnify the person whose name is used in the prosecution of the suit against all damages and costs.

Code 1858, § 2796; Shan., § 4493; Code 1932, § 8620; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-102.

Cross-References. Actions by commissioner of institutions on behalf of penitentiary, §41-1-112.

Costs against real plaintiff, §20-12-109.

Joinder of lienors in suit against boat, §66-19-203.

Joinder of plaintiffs in suit to enforce mechanics' lien, §66-11-131.

Party acting as own attorney, §23-1-109.

Real party in interest, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 17.01.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments, § 53; 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 27; 10 Tenn. Juris., Drains and Sewers, § 12; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, §§ 1, 4.

Law Reviews.

Parties and Claims, 4 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 280.

Comparative Legislation. Parties to actions:

Ala. Code §6-7-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-61-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §9-11-17 et seq.

Ky. R. C. P. 17 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §11-7-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 507.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 1A-1, Rule 17 et seq.

Va. Code § 8.01-5 et seq.

Cited: Bloch v. Busch, 160 Tenn. 21, 22 S.W.2d 242, 1929 Tenn. LEXIS 71 (1929).

20-1-103. Action on bond.

For any breach of an official bond or undertaking of any officer, executor, administrator or guardian, or of any bond or undertaking required to be given by law for the security of the public generally or of particular individuals, the party aggrieved may, without assignment, bring suit on the breach for the aggrieved party's use, giving security for costs and being liable therefor as if the suit had been brought in the aggrieved party's own name.

Code 1858, § 2797 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 16, § 4; 1825, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2, 5; 1826, ch. 27, § 1; 1851-1852, ch. 144, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 4494; Code 1932, § 8621; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-103.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 75, 78, 84.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, § 31; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 38.

Cited: Fort v. Dixie Oil Co., 170 Tenn. 464, 95 S.W.2d 931, 1936 Tenn. LEXIS 16 (1936).

20-1-104. Deserted wife as party.

Where a husband has deserted his family, the wife may prosecute or defend, in the husband's name, any action that the husband might have prosecuted or defended. The wife may also sue and be sued in her own name for any cause of action accruing subsequently to such desertion.

Code 1858, § 2805; Shan., § 4505; Code 1932, § 8632; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-104.

Cited: Rhea v. Iseley, 1 Shan. 220 (1871); St. Louis, I. M. & S. R. Co. v. Leazer, 119 Tenn. 1, 107 S.W. 684, 1907 Tenn. LEXIS 1 (1908); Jenkins v. General Cab Co., 175 Tenn. 409, 135 S.W.2d 448, 1939 Tenn. LEXIS 52 (1940).

20-1-105. Expenses and loss of service incident to injury to child.

The father and mother of a minor child have equal rights to maintain an action for the expenses and the actual loss of service resulting from an injury to a minor child in the parents' service or living in the family except that where one (1) parent is dead or has deserted the family, the other parent shall have the sole right to maintain the action.

In case the father and mother of the minor child are living apart and one (1) parent has exclusive legal custody of the child, the parent with legal custody has the sole right to maintain an action for the expenses and the actual loss of service resulting from an injury to the minor child, except that the noncustodial parent in such case shall have a right to maintain or join an action brought under this section, for the expenses resulting from an injury to the minor child to the extent the noncustodial parent has paid those expenses.

Code 1958, § 2803; Shan., § 4503; Code 1932, § 8630; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-105; Acts 1982, ch. 853, § 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 12; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parent and Child, §§ 8, 10.

Law Reviews.

Day on Torts: Can a Minor Sue for Pre-majority Medical Expenses? (John A. Day), 43 Tenn B.J. 29 (2007).

Parent's Cause of Action in Tennessee for Injured Child's Lost Earnings and Services, Expenses, and Lost Society: A Comparative Analysis (Steven W. Feldman), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 83 (1983).

Torts — Taylor v. Beard: The Tennessee Supreme Court Declines Adoption of a Cause of Action for Loss of Parental Consortium in Personal Injury Cases, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 737 (2004).

Cited: Rhea v. Iseley, 1 Shan. 220 (1871); Churchill v. Churchill, 203 Tenn. 406, 313 S.W.2d 436, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 318 (1958); Still v. Baptist Hospital, Inc., 755 S.W.2d 807, 1988 Tenn. App. LEXIS 315 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1988).

20-1-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-1-106 (Code 1858, §§ 2801, 2802; Shan. §§ 4501, 4502; Code 1932, §§ 8628, 8629; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-107), concerning actions for seduction, was repealed by Acts 1990, ch. 1056, § 3, effective January 1, 1991.

Acts 1990, ch. 1056, § 4 provided that any action filed prior to January 1, 1991, may be maintained under the law in effect on the date of such filing.

20-1-107. Several liability on joint obligations.

All joint obligations and promises are made joint and several, and the debt or obligation shall survive against the heirs and personal representatives of deceased obligors as well as against the survivors, and suits may be brought and prosecuted on the obligations and promises against all or any part of the original obligors, and all or any part of the representatives of deceased obligors, as if such obligations and assumptions were joint and several.

Code 1858, § 2789 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 57, § 5); Shan., § 4486; Code 1932, § 8613; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-108.

Cross-References. Joinder of persons needed for just adjudication, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 19.

Permissive joinder of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 20.

Service on joint obligor, §20-2-109.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 738.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bonds, § 15; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 92; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 6; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, § 52; 22 Tenn. Juris., Rescission, Cancellation and Reformation, § 36.

Law Reviews.

Permissible Joinder, Counterdeclarations and Crossbills: The Tennessee Procedure (Larry S. Banks), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 401.

20-1-108. Joinder of defendants on joint and several obligations.

Persons jointly or severally, or jointly and severally, bound on the same instrument, or by judgment, decree or statute, including the makers and endorsers of negotiable paper and sureties, may all or any part of them be sued in the same action.

Code 1858, § 2787 (deriv. Acts 1789, ch. 57, § 5; 1813, ch. 66, § 1; 1820, ch. 25, § 1; 1829, ch. 66, § 1; 1837-1838, ch. 5, § 1); Shan., § 4484; Code 1932, § 8611; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-109.

Cross-References. Joinder of persons needed for just adjudication, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 19.

Permissive joinder of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 20.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bail and Recognizance, §§ 6, 12; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, §§ 4, 7.

Law Reviews.

Permissible Joinder, Counterdeclarations and Crossbills: The Tennessee Procedure (Larry S. Banks), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 401.

Cited: National Surety Corp. v. Buckles, 31 Tenn. App. 610, 219 S.W.2d 207, 1948 Tenn. App. LEXIS 117 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1948); Day v. North American Rayon Corp., 140 F. Supp. 490, 1956 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3496 (D. Tenn. 1956); Travelers Ins. Co. v. Fidelity & Casualty Co., 219 Tenn. 244, 409 S.W.2d 175, 1966 Tenn. LEXIS 522 (1966).

20-1-109. Action in name used in instrument.

Suit may be brought by or against any of the parties to a written instrument on which the action is founded, by the name and description used in the instrument.

Code 1858, § 2788; Shan., § 4485; Code 1932, § 8612; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-110.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 116.

Cited: Martin Furniture Co. v. Massey, 135 Tenn. 338, 186 S.W. 451, 1916 Tenn. LEXIS 30 (1916).

20-1-110. Failure of recovery against joint defendants.

In all actions on contracts, a dismissal of suit as to one (1) or more of those jointly sued, or failure to recover as to one (1), shall not prevent a recovery against those defendants who may be liable.

Code 1858, § 2790 (deriv. Acts 1820, ch. 25, § 2); Shan., § 4487; Code 1932, § 8614; T.C.A (orig. ed.), § 20-111.

Cross-References. Dismissal against part of defendants, title 20, ch. 9, part 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 45.

Cited: Powers-Taylor Drug Co. v. Wafford, 53 S.W. 243, 1899 Tenn. Ch. App. LEXIS 70 (1899).

20-1-111. Maintaining action after executor or administrator removes from jurisdiction.

Where one (1) of several executors or administrators removes out of the state, actions may be prosecuted and judgments rendered against such as remain, in the same manner as if all were sued.

If the cause of action is within the jurisdiction of a judge of the court of general sessions, it may be prosecuted against the administrator or executor who remains in the county, where one (1) of them removes out of the state or into another county.

Code 1858, §§ 2791, 2792 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 38, § 1; 1827, ch. 84, § 1); Shan., §§ 4488, 4489; Code 1932, §§ 8615, 8616; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-112.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 741.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 92.

20-1-112. Defenses of executors sued separately.

The defendants, so separately sued, shall not be held further liable than if all were sued and may avail themselves of all the defenses allowed where all are sued.

Code 1858, § 2793 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 38, § 1; 1827, ch. 84, § 1); Shan., § 4490; Code 1932, § 8617; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-113.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 741.

Collateral References. 34 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators § 1045.

Executors and Administrators
432, 433.

20-1-113. Separate judgments against executors.

The same proceedings may be taken on judgments rendered in such separate suits, to subject the defendants for waste of assets or to subject real estate descended to heirs, as when all the executors or administrators are sued.

Code 1858, § 2794 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 38, § 2); Shan., § 4491; Code 1932, § 8618; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-114.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 741.

Law Reviews.

Issues Raised by “Jordan” (John A. Day), 35 No.12 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1999).

Collateral References. 34 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators § 793.

20-1-114. Addition of parties.

At any time before trial, new plaintiffs or defendants may be added to the suit by the plaintiff, upon supplemental process taken out and served or appearance entered.

If added at the appearance term, it may be done without costs; if at any subsequent term, on such terms as to costs and conditions as the court may prescribe, so as to prevent delay.

Code 1858, § 2798 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 152, § 6); Shan., § 4495; mod. Code 1932, § 8622; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-115.

Cross-References. Joinder of persons needed for just adjudication, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 19.

Misjoinder and nonjoinder of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 21.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 7; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 4.

Cited: State use of Giles County v. Abernathy, 159 Tenn. 175, 17 S.W.2d 17, 1928 Tenn. LEXIS 73 (1929); Kizer v. Bellar, 192 Tenn. 540, 241 S.W.2d 561, 1951 Tenn. LEXIS 301 (1951); Day v. North American Rayon Corp., 140 F. Supp. 490, 1956 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3496 (D. Tenn. 1956).

20-1-115. Intervention in property action.

In actions for the recovery of property, any person not a party to the action, on showing interest in the subject matter of the suit, may be allowed to appear as defendant in the action.

Code 1858, § 2799; Shan., § 4496; Code 1932, § 8623; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-116.

Cross-References. Intervention, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 24.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 48, 164; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 8.

Law Reviews.

Parties and Claims, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 280.

20-1-116. Substitution of defendant in property action.

At any time before defense made, the defendant may apply to the court to substitute in the defendant's place any person not already a party, who claims the money or property in suit, by filing an affidavit, stating the facts on which the person founds the application, showing that the right in the subject matter in controversy is in the third person; that the affiant has no interest in the suit, and may be exposed to the claim of two (2) or more adverse parties, denying all collusion with the party sought to be substituted, and proffering to pay the money or deliver the property into the custody of the court.

If, on notice to the plaintiff and the person sought to be substituted as defendant, sufficient cause is shown, the court may order the substitution and discharge the original defendant from liability to either party, and make such disposition, pending the suit, of the fund or property in controversy, as to secure the money, property or its value to the party who shall prove to be entitled.

Code 1858, § 2800 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 56, § 1); Shan., § 4497; Code 1932, § 8624; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-117.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 164; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 8.

Cited: Barnes v. Prudential Ins. Co., 28 Tenn. App. 109, 186 S.W.2d 918, 1944 Tenn. App. LEXIS 70 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1944); Hamilton Nat'l Bank v. Woods, 34 Tenn. App. 360, 238 S.W.2d 109, 1948 Tenn. App. LEXIS 138, 1948 Tenn. App. LEXIS 139 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1948).

Collateral References. 45 Am. Jur. 2d Interpleader § 19.

67A C.J.S. Parties §§ 103-111.

Parties
59.

20-1-117. Substitution for levying officer.

Where property is levied upon under any process of law by an officer and taken into possession, and an action is brought against the officer for the recovery of the property or for damages, any person at whose instance the process issued may be permitted to come into court at any time before the cause is finally disposed of and be substituted as defendant in the place of the officer, of which an entry shall be made upon the minutes of the court.

The party so substituted may, in the discretion of the court, be compelled to assume and give security for all costs that have or may become chargeable to the officer up to the time of the substitution.

Upon the substitution, the officer shall no longer be a party to the suit but shall be a competent witness in the suit.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 104, §§ 1, 3; Shan., §§ 4498, 4500; Code 1932, §§ 8625, 8627; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-118.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 8.

20-1-118. Default judgment against levying officer.

Upon written notice from the levying officer being served upon the party at whose instance the process issued, stating the nature of the suit, the court in which it is pending, and demanding that the party come into court and be substituted in the place of the officer, and stating the day upon which the application for substitution shall be made, if the party does not appear and become substituted in the officer's place, the officer may permit judgment to go by default against the officer or make defense.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 104, § 2; Shan., § 4499; mod. Code 1932, § 8626; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-119.

Cited: Chattanooga Cotton-Oil Co. v. Shamblin, 101 Tenn. 263, 47 S.W. 496, 1898 Tenn. LEXIS 60 (1898).

20-1-119. Comparative fault — Joinder of third party defendants.

In civil actions where comparative fault is or becomes an issue, if a defendant named in an original complaint initiating a suit filed within the applicable statute of limitations, or named in an amended complaint filed within the applicable statute of limitations, alleges in an answer or amended answer to the original or amended complaint that a person not a party to the suit caused or contributed to the injury or damage for which the plaintiff seeks recovery, and if the plaintiff's cause or causes of action against that person would be barred by any applicable statute of limitations but for the operation of this section, the plaintiff may, within ninety (90) days of the filing of the first answer or first amended answer alleging that person's fault, either:

Amend the complaint to add the person as a defendant pursuant to Tenn. R. Civ. P. 15 and cause process to be issued for that person; or

Institute a separate action against that person by filing a summons and complaint. If the plaintiff elects to proceed under this section by filing a separate action, the complaint so filed shall not be considered an original complaint initiating the suit or an amended complaint for purposes of this subsection (a).

A cause of action brought within ninety (90) days pursuant to subsection (a) shall not be barred by any statute of limitations. This section shall not extend any applicable statute of repose, nor shall this section permit the plaintiff to maintain an action against a person when such an action is barred by an applicable statute of repose.

This section shall neither shorten nor lengthen the applicable statute of limitations for any cause of action, other than as provided in subsection (a).

Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to any civil action commenced pursuant to § 28-1-105, except an action originally commenced in general sessions court and subsequently recommenced in circuit or chancery court.

This section shall not limit the right of any defendant to allege in an answer or amended answer that a person not a party to the suit caused or contributed to the injury for which the plaintiff seeks recovery.

As used in this section, “person” means any individual or legal entity.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, this section applies to suits involving governmental entities.

Acts 1993, ch. 407, § 1; 1999, ch. 485, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 407, § 2 provided that if any provision of that act is declared invalid on its face or as applied in a particular circumstance, each and every provision of the act shall be invalid and unenforceable.

Cross-References. Personal service on the state or any agency thereof, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04.

Specificity of answer to trigger savings statute, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 8.03.

Law Reviews.

Assumption of Risk in Tennessee Subsequent to the Adoption of Comparative Fault: Perez v. McConkey (Mark W. Milam), 60 Tenn. L. Rev. 1007 (1993).

Comparative Fault—Banks v. Elks Club Pride: Preserving Fairness in Liability While Adhering to Strict Comparative Fault Principles (Anna Rudman-Santos), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 637 (2011).

Comparative Fault in Tennessee: Where Are We Going and Why Are We in this Handbasket?, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 765 (2000).

Enough with the White Lie-ability: Decreasing Frivolous Health Care Liability Actions in Tennessee with Time and Transparency, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 503 (2015).

Fear the dark no more (John A. Day), 37 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 37 (2001).

No Fault for Phantoms (John A. Day), 36 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 27 (2000).

The Aftermath of Owens and Whitehead — Products Liability and Comparative Fault in Tennessee-How Deep Does the Relationship Run?, 32 U. Mem. L. Rev. 443 (2002).

The Category of Tough: Nonsuits III (Donald F. Paine), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 16 (1998).

The McIntyre Saving Statute (Donald F. Paine), 33 No.4.Tenn.B.J. 21 (1997).

Tort Law–Comparative Fault-Original Tortfeasor Rule in Tennessee (Dan Calvert), 78 Tenn. L. Rev. 259 (2010).

Torts — Ridings v. Ralph M. Parsons Co.: The Tennessee Supreme Court Rejects Use of Employer Negligence to Reduce Liability of Defendants in Post-McIntyre On-the-Job Tort Cases, 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1533 (1996).

Torts — Volz v. Ledes: The Tennessee Supreme Court Abolishes Joint and Several Liability in Medical Malpractice Cases Involving Multiple Tortfeasors Whose Separate Acts Cause Indivisible Injury, 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1555 (1996).

What Now? Statutes of Limitations, Amended Complaints and McInytre (Jeffrey L. Ingram), 29 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 10 (1993).

Cited: Smith v. Methodist Hosps. of Memphis, 995 S.W.2d 584, 1999 Tenn. App. LEXIS 4 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1999); Resor v. Graves, 108 F. Supp. 2d 929, 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14720 (E.D. Tenn. 2000); Lipscomb v. Doe, 32 S.W.3d 840, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 663 (Tenn. 2000); Wielgus v. Dover Indus., 39 S.W.3d 124, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 369 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000); Breeding v. Edwards, 62 S.W.3d 170, 2001 Tenn. App. LEXIS 459 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2001); First Tenn. Nat'l Corp. v. Horizon Nat'l Bank, 225 F. Supp. 2d 816, 2002 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19972 (W.D. Tenn. 2002); McNabb v. Highways, Inc., 98 S.W.3d 649, 2003 Tenn. LEXIS 163 (Tenn. 2003); Phillips v. Allergan, Inc., — F. Supp. 2d —, 2008 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 44692 (M.D. Tenn. June 2, 2008); Bellsouth Telcoms., Inc. v. Young, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 330 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 21, 2011); Johnson v. Floyd, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 448 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 29, 2012).